Maryland, session 2025, HB0715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
22–102.
This title applies only in Harford County.
22–1601.
(a) For every [4,000] 4,750 individuals in the county, as specified by the
Maryland Department of Health, the Board may not issue more than:
(1) one Class A (off–sale) license;
(2) one Class A–1 (off–sale) license; or
(3) one Class A–2 (off–sale) license.
(b) If the number of licenses in a class exceeds the quota specified in subsection
(a) of this section, the Board may not issue a new license of that class unless the number of
– 1 –

Ch. 802 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
licenses of that class are reduced by revocation or surrender, creating a vacancy under the
particular quota specified.
(c) This section does not apply to the transfer, conversion, or renewal of a license.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –